Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF992.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 452A.53, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5. Each vehicle operated into or through Iowa in interstate operations using motor fuel, special fuel, or electric fuel acquired in any other state shall carry in or on the vehicle a duplicate or evidence of the permit or license required in this section. A fee not to exceed fifty cents one dollar shall House File 992, p. 2 be charged for each duplicate or other evidence of a permit or license issued. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 992, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor